New Jersey, session 221, A5511.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, public utility means a public utility as defined in R.S.48:2-13. b.    A public utility shall include a bill insert to the utility bill of any customer affected by an increase to an individual rate, joint rate, toll, charge, or schedule approved by the Board of Public Utilities.  The bill insert shall be provided in 12-point font, be written in plain language, in both English and Spanish, and include, but not be limited to: (1) an itemized list of any increases to an individual rate, joint rate,   toll, charge, or schedule affecting that customer; and (2) an explanation of the reasoning behind any increases. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.